Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB184.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 214.630 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If the defendant is able to pay, he or she shall pay all fees and costs associated with
this action.
(2) If the defendant is found by the court to be indigent, all fees and costs shall be
waived and defendant shall be represented by an attorney from, or under contract to
the Department of Public Advocacy.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/14/2025 10:26 AM Jacketed